Michigan, session 2025-2026, SB0592.
people of the state of michigan enact: Sec. 83. (1) The department shall provide all of the following to a prisoner who is discharged from custody prior to his or her before the prisoner's maximum discharge date without being granted parole because his or her that prisoner's conviction or sentence has been reversed, vacated, or overturned, or who is discharged from custody immediately after being resentenced by a court for a qualifying event: (a) Reentry services, excluding reentry housing, consistent with the services received by parolees in this state for a period not to exceed 2 years following the date of his or her the prisoner's discharge. (b) Reentry housing, consistent with the transitional housing provided to parolees in this state for a period not to exceed 1 year following the date of his or her the prisoner's discharge. (c) Vital documents, including, but not limited to, the prisoner's birth certificate and any official state personal identification card. (2) The department shall assign staff to ensure that a prisoner eligible for the services and documents described in subsection (1) is provided with those services and documents in a timely manner. (3) A prisoner who received the reentry services described in subsection (1) and whose conviction is subsequently reinstated or who is resentenced and returned to the custody of the department for the same conviction that was previously reversed, vacated, or overturned entitling him or her the prisoner to the services described in subsection (1) shall repay the department for all reentry services he or she that prisoner received under subsection (1). The department shall determine the amount owed by a prisoner under this subsection. shall be determined by the department. (4) As used in this section, "qualifying event" means the resentencing required by Miller v Alabama, 567 US 460 (2012), Montgomery v Louisiana, 577 US 190 (2016), People v Parks, 510 Mich 225 (2022), or People v Stovall, 510 Mich 301 (2022).